Illinois, session 104th, SB1368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Military Veterans Assistance Act is amended 5by changing Section 9 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 45/9)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3089)7    Sec. 9. Veterans Assistance Commission. 8    (a) In counties having 2 or more veteran service 9organizations as may be recognized by law, the veteran service 10organizations may come together to form a Veterans Assistance 11Commission of such county. The Veterans Assistance Commission 12of such county may act as the central service office for all 13veterans and their families and for the families of deceased 14veterans. The Commission shall be composed of delegates and 15alternates from a majority of such veteran service 16organizations selected annually as determined by each veteran 17service organization. When so organized a Commission shall be 18clothed with all the powers and may be charged with all the 19duties theretofore devolving upon the different veteran 20service organizations within the county as provided in Section 212.22        (1) Every January 1, all Veterans Assistance 23    Commissions shall publish a notice to each veteran service   SB1368 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1    organization within their respective county calling on 2    them to select delegates and alternates for that county's 3    Veterans Assistance Commission by the methods provided in 4    this subsection. The Veterans Assistance Commissions shall 5    allow each veteran service organization until March 1 to 6    respond, at which time those selected and duly appointed 7    delegates and alternates shall begin their term of office 8    with full voting rights. Once selected, delegates and 9    alternates are bound by the Public Officer Prohibited 10    Activities Act.11        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), veteran 12    service organizations shall be permitted to select one 13    delegate and one alternate.14        (3) In counties with 5 or more of the same veteran 15    service organizations, all the constituent veteran service 16    organizations shall be permitted to select up to 5 17    delegates and 5 alternates to represent that veteran 18    service organization instead of each constituent veteran 19    service organization selecting one delegate and one 20    alternate. For the purposes of meeting the majority 21    requirement of this subsection, when the constituent 22    groups of a veteran service organization choose to select 23    those delegates and alternates, those selected and duly 24    appointed delegates and alternates shall represent the 25    aggregate percentage of the constituent groups.26        (4) If a veteran service organization serves more than   SB1368 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1    one county, then it shall be permitted to select one 2    delegate and one alternate for the Veterans Assistance 3    Commission in each county in which at least 25% of its 4    members reside. 5        (5) All undertakings of, or actions taken by, the 6    Commission shall require a vote from a majority of the 7    full commission membership. No committee or other subgroup 8    of delegates and alternates formed by the Commission, 9    whether selected or appointed, may be granted the power or 10    authority to act in the place of or on behalf of the full 11    body of the duly selected or appointed Commission 12    membership.13        (6) No superintendent or any other employee of the 14    Veterans Assistance Commission may retain the position of 15    delegate or alternate or any voting rights while employed 16    by the Veterans Assistance Commission.17        (7) No committee or other subgroup of delegates and 18    alternates formed by the Commission, whether selected or 19    appointed, may bar any other duly appointed Commission 20    member from attending or otherwise being present during 21    any closed meetings or sessions of that committee or 22    group.23        (8) The county may, at its discretion, appoint a 24    representative to the Commission who may attend any public 25    meeting of the Commission. That representative shall be a 26    veteran, may not have voting rights, may not hold any   SB1368 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1    office or title on the Commission, and may not be present 2    during any nonpublic meeting of the Commission, except as 3    authorized in this Act. For matters of executive session, 4    the non-voting county appointee may attend meetings that 5    are closed in accordance with paragraphs (1), (3), (5), 6    (6), or (11) of subsection (c) of Section 2 of the Open 7    Meetings Act for litigation matters not relating to 8    litigation between the Commission and the County. 9    (b) The Commission and its selected or appointed 10superintendent shall have oversight of the distribution of all 11moneys and supplies appropriated for the benefit of military 12veterans and their families, subject to such rules, 13regulations, administrative procedures or audit reviews as are 14required by this Act and as are necessary as approved by the 15Commission to carry out the spirit and intent of this Act. No 16warrant authorized under this Act may be issued for the 17payment of money without the presentation of an itemized 18statement or claim, approved by the superintendent of the 19Commission.20    (c) The superintendent of the Veterans Assistance 21Commission, selected, appointed, or hired by the Commission is 22an at-will employee who shall be answerable to, and shall 23report to, the Commission.24    (d) The superintendent shall be evaluated annually and a 25written report shall be generated. A copy of the report from 26the evaluation shall be provided to the entire Commission   SB1368 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1membership.2    (e) A superintendent may be removed from office if, after 3delegates from no less than 3 different veteran service 4organizations file a written request calling for the 5superintendent's removal, there is a vote from a majority of 6the full Commission membership in favor of such removal.7    (f) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall establish 8and maintain bylaws that outline the framework, policies, and 9procedures for conducting the business of the Commission and 10for the rules and regulations that apply to its members. Those 11bylaws shall reflect compliance with all relevant laws at the 12time they are established and shall be revised as necessary to 13remain in compliance with current law. The establishment of 14those bylaws, and any revisions thereafter, shall require a 15minimum two-thirds majority vote of approval from a majority 16of the full Commission membership.17    (g) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall, in writing, 18adopt all applicable policies already established and in place 19in its respective county, including, but not limited to, 20policies related to compensation, employee rights, ethics, 21procurement, and budget, and shall adapt those policies to fit 22its organizational structure. Those policies shall then be 23considered the policies of the Veterans Assistance Commission 24and they shall be implemented and adhered to, accordingly, by 25the superintendent and by the Commission. The Commission shall 26amend its adopted policies whenever a county board amends an   SB1368 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1applicable policy within 60 days of the county board 2amendment.3    (h) No warrant authorized under this Act may be issued for 4the payment of money without the presentation of an itemized 5statement or claim, approved by the superintendent of the 6Commission and reported to the full Commission membership.7    (i) Each Veterans Assistance Commission shall perform an 8annual audit in accordance with the Governmental Account Audit 9Act using either the auditing services provided by its 10respective county or the services of an independent auditor 11whose services shall be paid for by the Commission. A copy of 12that audit report shall be provided to the president or 13chairperson of the county board.14    (j) Veterans Assistance Commissions and county boards 15subject to this Act shall cooperate fully with the boards, 16commissions, agencies, departments, and institutions of the 17State. The funds held and made available by the county, the 18State, or any other source shall be subject to financial and 19compliance audits in accordance with the Illinois State 20Auditing Act. 21    (k) The Veterans Assistance Commission shall be in charge 22of the administration of any benefits provided under Articles 23VI and IX of the Illinois Public Aid Code for military veterans 24and their families.25    (l) The Veterans Assistance Commission shall represent 26veterans in their application for or attempts to obtain   SB1368 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1benefits and services through State and federal agencies, 2including representing veterans in their appeals of adverse 3decisions.4    (m) The superintendent of the Veterans Assistance 5Commission and its employees must comply with the procedures 6and regulations adopted by the Veterans Assistance Commission 7and the regulations of the Department of Human Services.8    (n) To further the intent of this Act of assisting 9military veterans, this Act is to be construed so that the 10Veterans Assistance Commission shall provide needed services 11to eligible veterans.12    (o)(1) In counties that do not have a Veterans Assistance 13Commission prior to January 1, 2026, and in which there exists 14a judicial circuit whose jurisdictional boundaries include 15multiple counties, veteran service organizations located 16within any of those counties that are within the judicial 17circuit's jurisdictional boundaries may come together and 18create a Jurisdictional Veterans Assistance Commission that 19shall provide services to veterans and their families who 20reside in those participating counties. Each participating 21county shall levy the minimum amount of 0.02%, as indicated in 22Section 2, and deposit the proceeds in the county treasury of 23the seat of that judicial circuit. These proceeds shall be 24used for employment of staff of the Veterans Assistance 25Commission and financial assistance for the veterans and their 26families that reside within the geographical boundaries of   SB1368 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1that judicial circuit. The Veterans Assistance Commission 2shall be known as the Veterans Assistance Commission of that 3judicial circuit.4    (2) Participating counties shall provide the support and 5materials required to administer a Jurisdictional Veterans 6Assistance Commission in the same manner individual counties 7are required under this Act to provide support and materials 8to single-county Veterans Assistance Commissions.9    (3) The superintendent of a Veterans Assistance Commission 10formed in accordance with paragraph (1) shall be selected from 11among all honorably discharged veterans of all participating 12counties within that judicial circuit's boundaries and shall 13maintain a centrally located office within that judicial 14circuit. However, for a Veterans Assistance Commission formed 15within a large judicial circuit, the superintendent is not 16precluded from having multiple offices that shall be owned and 17maintained by the Veterans Assistance Commission.18    (4) Delegates and alternates shall be selected by the 19veterans service organizations of that judicial circuit in the 20same manner as prescribed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a).21    (5) Any existing Veterans Assistance Commission that is 22part of a Judicial Circuit that is comprised of multiple 23counties, as of January 1, 2025, may merge into a Veterans 24Assistance Commission of that Judicial Circuit with its 25neighboring counties. Those existing Veterans Assistance 26Commissions that choose not to merge may continue to exist   SB1368 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08902 KTG 18957 b1independently while the other counties combine to form a new 2Veterans Assistance Commission of that judicial circuit.3(Source: P.A. 102-484, eff. 8-20-21; 102-732, eff. 1-1-23; 4102-1132, eff. 2-10-23.)